Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) As used in this section:
(a)(A) “Fenestration product or system” means a window, glass, glazing  or glazing sys-
tem or  skylight, whether installed in a horizontal or vertical plane, that is designed to pro-
vide a weatherproof barrier.
(B) “Fenestration product or system” does not include a premanufactured window  or
skylight.
(b) “National certification” means a certification that meets one of the  following stand-
ards:
(A) For glazing contractors, a certification that is in effect on the effective date  of this
2025 Act and that Administrative Management  Systems, Incorporated, or a successor or-
ganization, administers under the North American Contractor Certification program; or
(B) For architectural glass  and metal technicians, the Architectural Glass and Metal
Technician national certification, as in  effect on the effective date of this 2025 Act, that
Administrative Management Systems, Incorporated, or a  successor organization, adminis-
ters.
(c) “Public agency” means the State of Oregon or a political  subdivision of the State of
Oregon or a county, city, district, authority, public corporation or public entity that is or-
ganized and exists under a law or charter or an instrumentality  of the county, city, district,
authority, public corporation or public entity.
(d) “Public building” has the meaning given that term in ORS 455.560.
(e) “Public funds” means funds of which an officer or employee of  a public body, as de-
fined in ORS 174.109, has custody or control by virtue of a legal right that the  public body
confers by  law upon the officer or employee to direct the collection, use or transfer of
moneys payable to, belonging to or collected for the public body.
(2) A public agency that  provides public funds to install, repair or remodel a fenestration
product or system in a public building that the public agency constructs,  remodels or repairs
and owns or leases shall require, as a condition of providing  the public funds for the instal-
lation, repair or remodeling, that:
(a) The contractor that installs, repairs or remodels the fenestration product  or system:
Enrolled House Bill 2680 (HB 2680-A) Page 1
(A) Has all licenses and  insurance required to perform construction work in this state;
and
(B) Has a national certification as a glazing contractor; and
(b) One or more of the workers or technicians that provides the labor for,  or direct
oversight of, the installation,  repair or remodeling has a national certification as an archi-
tectural glass and metal technician.
(3) The requirement set forth in subsection  (2) of this section applies to public buildings
in which a public agency provides of $25 million or more in public funds  for new construction
or $5 million  or more in public funds for installing, repairing or remodeling, but not for
providing routine maintenance for, a fenestration product or system in a public  building that
the public agency constructs, remodels or repairs and owns or leases.
(4) A contractor that  installs, repairs or remodels a fenestration product or system in a
public building described in subsection (3) of this section, in  addition to having a national
certification as  a glazing contractor, must employ at least one worker or technician with a
national certification as an architectural glass and metal technician.
SECTION 2.
 Section 1 of this 2025 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  (1) As used in this section:
(a)(A) “Fenestration product or system” means a window, glass, glazing or  glazing system or
skylight, whether installed in a horizontal or vertical plane,  that is designed to provide a
weatherproof barrier.
(B) “Fenestration product or system” does not include a premanufactured window or skylight.
(b) “National certification” means a certification that meets one of the following standards:
(A) For glazing contractors, a certification that is  in effect on the effective date of this 2025
Act  and  that Administrative Management Systems, Incorporated, or a successor organization, ad-
ministers under the North American Contractor Certification program; or
(B) For architectural glass and metal technicians, the Architectural  Glass and Metal Technician
national certification, as in effect on the effective date of  this 2025 Act, that Administrative Man-
agement Systems, Incorporated, or a successor organization, administers.
(c) “Public agency” means the State of Oregon or a political subdivision of the  State of Oregon
or a county, city, district, authority, public corporation  or public entity that is organized and exists
under a  law or charter or an instrumentality of the county, city, district, authority, public corpo-
ration or public entity.
(d) “Public building” has the meaning given that term in ORS 455.560.
(e) “Public funds” means funds of which an officer or employee of a public body, as defined  in
ORS 174.109, has custody or control by virtue of a legal right that the public body confers by  law
upon the officer or  employee to direct the collection, use or transfer of moneys payable to, belonging
to or collected for the public body.
(2) A public agency that provides public funds to install, repair or remodel  a fenestration prod-
uct or system in a public building  that the public agency constructs, remodels or repairs and owns
or leases shall require, as a condition of providing the public funds for the installation,  repair or
remodeling, that:
(a) The contractor that installs, repairs or remodels the fenestration product or system:
(A) Has all licenses and insurance required to perform construction work in this state; and
(B) Has a national certification as a glazing contractor; and
(b) One or more of the workers or technicians that  provides the labor for, or direct oversight
of, the installation, repair or remodeling has a  national certification as an architectural glass and
metal technician.
(3) The requirement set forth in subsection (2) of this section applies to public buildings in which
a public agency provides of $25 million or more in public funds for new construction or  $5 million
or more in public funds for installing, repairing or remodeling, but not for providing routine  main-
tenance for, a fenestration  product or system in a public building that the public agency constructs,
remodels or repairs and owns or leases.
Enrolled House Bill 2680 (HB 2680-A) Page 2
(4) A contractor that installs, repairs or remodels a fenestration product or system in  a public
building described in subsection (3) of this section, in addition to  having a national certification as
a glazing contractor, must [ employ at least  one worker or technician with a national certification as
an architectural glass and metal technician ] demonstrate to the public  agency as a condition of
receiving public funds that at least  25 percent of the contractor’s employees who install,
repair or remodel fenestration products or systems have a national  certification as archi-
tectural glass and metal technicians .
SECTION 3. (1) Section 1 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on July 1, 2027.
(2) The amendments to section  1 of this 2025 Act by section 2 of this 2025 Act become
operative on July 1, 2028.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House April 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 2, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2680 (HB 2680-A) Page 3